Utah statutes.
48-2c-1705 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Expenses.

If an action under Section 48-2c-1701 is successful, in whole or in part, or if anything is received by the plaintiff as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of any such action or claim, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees.  The court shall order that any such award be paid out of the proceeds received by the plaintiff, if any, in which case the plaintiff shall remit to the company the remainder of the proceeds.  If those proceeds are insufficient to reimburse the plaintiff's reasonable expenses, the court may direct that any such award of the plaintiff's expenses or a portion of the expenses be paid by the company.

